New York, session 2025-2026, S5842.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 339-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 339-a. Alzheimer's disease resource notification. The superintendent 4 shall require an insurer authorized to write accident and health insur- 5 ance in this state, a corporation organized pursuant to article forty- 6 three of this chapter, and a health maintenance organization certified 7 pursuant to article forty-four of the public health law to provide 8 insureds and enrollees written informational resources regarding 9 Alzheimer's disease no later than sixty days after being notified, 10 through claims data or by the insured or enrollee, of such insured or 11 enrollee's diagnosis with Alzheimer's disease. The informational 12 resources shall be delivered by United States postal mail unless the 13 insured or enrollee consents to another method of notification, includ- 14 ing electronic notification. Such resources shall include: 15 (a) written information about Alzheimer's disease, including informa- 16 tion on the range of physical, developmental, educational, and psychoso- 17 cial outcomes for individuals living with Alzheimer's disease, that: 18 (1) is up-to-date, evidence-based, and culturally and linguistically 19 appropriate for the individual; and 20 (2) was developed by: 21 (i) medical experts or representatives of national medical or genetics 22 organizations; and 23 (ii) disability experts or representatives of patient advocacy groups; 24 and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06685-01-5 S. 5842 2 1 (b) contact information for one or more organizations that specialize 2 in support for people with Alzheimer's disease, such as the Alzheimer's 3 Association. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.